Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1599
Commissioners; vacancies.

All vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired terms. A vacancy shall be filled not later than six months after the date of such vacancy by the same authority and in the same manner as the previous commissioner whose position has become vacant was appointed.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 28;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 185.